Massachusetts, session 194th, H5060.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 10 of chapter 218 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the clause “district court of northern
Berkshire”, in line 14, the following words:- district court of Edgartown
SECTION 2. Said section 10 of said chapter 218 is hereby further amended by inserting
after the clause “district court of western Hampden” in line 19, the following words:- district
court of Nantucket.
of 1